Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB78.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. John Tabacsko Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) PFC John Tabacsko, a native of Banks Township, gave his life in service to his country during World War II.(2) Before entering the service, PFC Tabacsko was employed by the Clark Coal Company near Bear Run.(3) PFC Tabacsko entered the Army in August 1942 and completed basic training at Camp Wheeler, Georgia.(4) PFC Tabacsko served with the 472 Field Artillery Battalion in Company B for seven months during his time of service.(5) On March 24, 1945, PFC John Tabacsko was killed in action in the Philippines on Luzon Island when he was only 23 years of age.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 67586, located over the South Branch of Bear Run on State Route 1053 in Banks Township, Indiana County, is designated as the PFC John Tabacsko Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.SECTION 2. CORPORAL JAMES D. SLOAN MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:20250SB0078PN1011 - 4 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 (1) CORPORAL JAMES D. SLOAN WAS BORN NOVEMBER 15, 1949, IN LILLY BOROUGH, CAMBRIA COUNTY, AND ATTENDED PENN-CAMBRIA HIGH SCHOOL WHERE HE PARTICIPATED IN FOOTBALL AND WRESTLING.(2) CORPORAL SLOAN ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS AND WAS PROMOTED TO CORPORAL ON DECEMBER 28, 1967.(3) DURING HIS SERVICE, CORPORAL SLOAN RECEIVED THE NATIONAL DEFENSE SERVICE MEDAL, VIETNAM CAMPAIGN MEDAL, VIETNAM SERVICE MEDAL, THE COMBAT ACTION MEDAL, THE NAVY COMMENDATION MEDAL, THE PURPLE HEART MEDAL AND THE RIFLE MARKSMAN BADGE.(4) UPON CORPORAL SLOAN'S RETURN HOME FROM THE VIETNAM WAR HE SUFFERED GREATLY FROM THE INVISIBLE WOUNDS OF WAR, ESPECIALLY POST-TRAUMATIC STRESS DISORDER.(5) ON MARCH 12, 1971, CORPORAL JAMES D. SLOAN PASSED AWAY DUE TO SUICIDE FROM POST-TRAUMATIC STRESS DISORDER.(6) CORPORAL JAMES D. SLOAN'S STORY OF SOLDIER SUICIDE AND THE PREVALENCE OF POST-TRAUMATIC STRESS DISORDER AMONG VETERANS CANNOT BE UNDERSTATED.(7) CORPORAL SLOAN'S STORY SERVES AS A POIGNANT EXAMPLE OF THE STRUGGLES FACED BY THOSE WHO SERVE THE UNITED STATES AND THE URGENT NEED FOR BETTER SUPPORT AND RESOURCES FOR VETERANS SUFFERING FROM MENTAL ILLNESS.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 8377, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 53 OVER BEAR ROCK RUN IN LILLY BOROUGH, CAMBRIA COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE CORPORAL JAMES D. SLOAN MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 3. USMCR MARY A. LIDWELL MEMORIAL BRIDGE.20250SB0078PN1011 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS MARY A. LIDWELL WAS BORN OCTOBER 11, 1923, IN AMSBRY AND ATTENDED GALLITZIN HIGH SCHOOL IN 1942.(2) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS LIDWELL VOLUNTEERED FOR THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS IN 1943 AND BECAME A MEMBER OF THE WOMEN'S AVIATION RESERVE SQUADRON UNTIL SHE LEFT THE SERVICE IN 1946. THE WOMEN'S AVIATION RESERVE SQUADRON, LOCATED IN EL TORO, CALIFORNIA, AT THE TIME, WAS TASKED WITH REPAIRING DAMAGED AIRPLANES DURING WORLD WAR II. FOR HER EXEMPLARY WORK, PRIVATE FIRST CLASS LIDWELL WAS AWARDED THE CONGRESSIONAL ROSIE THE RIVETER MEDAL.(3) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS LIDWELL, AT 101 YEARS OF AGE, CONTINUES TO BE AN ACTIVE MEMBER OF HER COMMUNITY IN ASHVILLE BOROUGH BY VOLUNTEERING HER TIME AT HER CHURCH, BEING INVOLVED IN COMMUNITY PROJECTS, FUNDRAISING FOR CHARITIES AND WORKING WITH THE VFW LADIES AUXILIARY. SHE ALSO SERVED AS THE ASHVILLE BOROUGH SECRETARY AND TREASURER FOR MANY YEARS.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 8387, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 53 OVER PATTY'S RUN IN GALLITZIN TOWNSHIP, CAMBRIA COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE USMCR MARY A. LIDWELL MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 4. PFC EARL "BUTCH" LONG MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) EARL WAYNE LONG WAS BORN IN RUFFS DALE ON MARCH 8, 20250SB0078PN1011 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1947.(2) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS LONG ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY DURING THE VIETNAM WAR.(3) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS LONG SERVED AS AN 11B-INFANTRYMAN IN B TROOP, 1ST SQUADRON, 11TH ARMORED CAVALRY REGIMENT.(4) ON AUGUST 15, 1967, PRIVATE FIRST CLASS LONG WAS A PASSENGER IN AN ARMORED PERSONNEL CARRIER ON A COMBAT OPERATION WHEN THE VEHICLE HIT A HOSTILE MINE.(5) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS LONG WAS KILLED ON AUGUST 15, 1967, IN PHUOC LONG, SOUTH VIETNAM, AT 20 YEARS OF AGE BY A HOSTILE EXPLOSIVE DEVICE.(6) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS LONG WAS LAID TO REST AT WESTMORELAND COUNTY MEMORIAL PARK IN GREENSBURG.(7) FOR HIS MERITORIOUS SERVICE, PRIVATE FIRST CLASS LONG WAS AWARDED THE BRONZE STAR, THE PURPLE HEART MEDAL, THE NATIONAL DEFENSE SERVICE MEDAL, THE VIETNAM SERVICE MEDAL AND THE REPUBLIC OF VIETNAM CAMPAIGN MEDAL.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE PORTION OF STATE ROUTE 3037 FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH WALTZ MILL FLATS ROAD TO SEGMENT 0170/OFFSET 0950 IN SEWICKLEY TOWNSHIP, WESTMORELAND COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE PFC EARL "BUTCH" LONG MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 5. PRIVATE FIRST CLASS BRUCE A. COBB MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) BRUCE A. COBB WAS BORN JUNE 27, 1949, IN BRADFORD, MCKEAN COUNTY.20250SB0078PN1011 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS COBB ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS SERVING WITH COMPANY I, 3RD BATTALION, 7TH MARINE REGIMENT.(3) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS COBB WAS KILLED IN ACTION ON MARCH 25, 1968, IN QUANG NAM PROVINCE, VIETNAM.(4) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS COBB WAS AWARDED SEVERAL MEDALS DURING HIS SERVICE AND POSTHUMOUSLY, INCLUDING: THE COMBAT ACTION RIBBON, THE NAVY PRESIDENTIAL UNIT CITATION, THE VIETNAM SERVICE MEDAL, THE VIETNAM CIVIL ACTIONS UNIT CITATION, THE NATIONAL DEFENSE SERVICE MEDAL, THE REPUBLIC OF VIETNAM GALLANTRY CROSS UNIT CITATION, THE REPUBLIC OF VIETNAM CAMPAIGN MEDAL AND THE PURPLE HEART.(5) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS COBB IS BURIED IN THE WILLOW DALE CEMETERY IN BRADFORD, MCKEAN COUNTY.(6) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS COBB'S NAME IS ENSHRINED ON THE VIETNAM WAR MEMORIAL, IN WASHINGTON, DC, AT PANEL 46E, LINE 15.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 25406, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 346 OVER WILLOW CREEK IN CORYDON TOWNSHIP, MCKEAN COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE PRIVATE FIRST CLASS BRUCE A. COBB MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 6. WO1 JOHN STEPHEN CHRIN MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:(1) JOHN STEPHEN CHRIN WAS BORN JUNE 24, 1949, IN LEBANON, LEBANON COUNTY.(2) WARRANT OFFICER CHRIN GRADUATED FROM LEBANON CATHOLIC HIGH SCHOOL IN 1967 AND EVENTUALLY ATTENDED 20250SB0078PN1011 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MANSFIELD STATE COLLEGE.(3) IN 1970, DURING HIS JUNIOR YEAR, WARRANT OFFICER CHRIN LEFT MANSFIELD STATE COLLEGE AND ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY ON APRIL 28, 1970.(4) IN THE ARMY, WARRANT OFFICER CHRIN ATTENDED WARRANT OFFICER FLIGHT SCHOOL AND BECAME A COMBAT MEDICAL EVACUATION (DUSTOFF) PILOT WITH THE RANK OF WARRANT OFFICER 1.(5) WARRANT OFFICER CHRIN ARRIVED IN VIETNAM ON JULY 5, 1971, AND WAS ASSIGNED TO THE 57 MEDICAL DETACHMENT (HELICOPTER AMBULANCE) 68 MEDICAL GROUP (THE ORIGINAL DUSTOFF), AT BING THUY IN THE MEKONG DELTA.(6) ON OCTOBER 13, 1971, WARRANT OFFICER CHRIN WAS KILLED IN ACTION WHILE HIS DUSTOFF 71 WAS ON A MEDVAC MISSION AND CRASHED DURING A NIGHT DUSTOFF FLIGHT IN MONSOON RAINS IN THE SEVEN SISTERS MOUNTAINS ON THE CAMBODIAN BORDER. FIVE BODIES WERE RECOVERED.(7) AT THE TIME OF HIS DEATH, WARRANT OFFICER CHRIN HAD FLOWN MORE THAN 125 COMBAT MEDICAL EVACUATION MISSIONS THROUGH THE DELTA AREA OF VIETNAM.(8) WARRANT OFFICER CHRIN AND HIS CREW AND ANOTHER 3,200 OTHER DUSTOFF CREW MEMBERS FLEW MORE THAN 490,000 COMBAT MEDICAL EVACUATION MISSIONS, RESCUING MORE THAN 900,000 WOUNDED, AT A COST OF 216 KILLED IN ACTION AND 1,300 WOUNDED.(9) WARRANT OFFICER CHRIN WAS AWARDED THE PURPLE HEART, SIX AIR MEDALS, A NATIONAL DEFENSE MEDAL, THE VIETNAM SERVICE MEDAL AND THE AVIATOR BADGE FOR HIS MERITORIOUS SERVICE.(10) WARRANT OFFICER CHRIN IS MEMORIALIZED ON THE VIETNAM VETERANS WAR MEMORIAL ON PANEL 2W, LINE 38.(11) TO HONOR HIS MEMORY, IN 2015, THE MAYOR OF LEBANON PROCLAIMED EVERY OCTOBER 13 AS "JOHN STEPHEN CHRIN DAY" IN 20250SB0078PN1011 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE CITY.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 22726, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 934 OVER SWATARA CREEK IN EAST HANOVER TOWNSHIP, LEBANON COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE WO1 JOHN STEPHEN CHRIN MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 7. PRIVATE MYLES NESS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) MYLES ALBERT NESS WAS BORN DECEMBER 4, 1892, IN YORK, YORK COUNTY.(2) PRIVATE NESS JOINED THE UNITED STATES ARMY IN 1917 WHERE HE SERVED AS A PRIVATE IN THE 6TH INFANTRY REGIMENT FIGHTING IN WORLD WAR I IN WHICH HE WAS WOUNDED IN ACTION.(3) THE 6TH INFANTRY REGIMENT WAS PART OF THE 5TH INFANTRY DIVISION DURING THE WAR AND FOUGHT IN SEVERAL CAMPAIGNS BUT PRIMARILY FOUGHT IN THE MEUSE-ARGONNE OFFENSIVE.(4) PRIVATE NESS DIED ON MAY 15, 1958, AND IS BURIED AT THE ZION UNITED METHODIST CHURCH ON FREYSVILLE ROAD IN WINDSOR TOWNSHIP, YORK COUNTY.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 44210, CARRYING STATE ROUTE 2001 OVER KREUTZ CREEK IN WINDSOR TOWNSHIP, YORK COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE PRIVATE MYLES NESS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.20250SB0078PN1011 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 8. PFC TRAVIS C. ZIMMERMAN MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) TRAVIS CLYDE ZIMMERMAN WAS BORN OCTOBER 26, 1986.(2) PFC ZIMMERMAN WAS THE SON OF LLOYD C. ZIMMERMAN, JR., AND GAIL (CLEMENS) CAMPERSON.(3) HE ATTENDED BOYERTOWN AREA HIGH SCHOOL GRADUATING IN 2005.(4) PFC ZIMMERMAN ENJOYED HUNTING, FISHING, CANOEING, SWIMMING, GOLF, FRISBEE, WRESTLING AND TENNIS.(5) HE ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY AND WAS STATIONED AT FORT CAMPBELL WITH BRAVO COMPANY OF THE 101ST AIRBORNE, 2ND BATTALION, 502ND INFANTRY REGIMENT, KNOWN AS THE SCREAMING EAGLES.(6) PFC ZIMMERMAN WAS FURTHER STATIONED AT CAMP STRIKER IN SOUTH BAGHDAD, IRAQ.(7) TRAVIS CLYDE ZIMMERMAN WAS KILLED IN ACTION ON APRIL 22, 2006, IN IRAQ WHILE SERVING HIS COUNTRY.(8) HE WAS POSTHUMOUSLY PROMOTED TO PRIVATE FIRST CLASS AND AWARDED THE BRONZE STAR AND PURPLE HEART.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 56130, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 562 OVER MANATAWNY CREEK IN AMITY TOWNSHIP, BERKS COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE PFC TRAVIS C. ZIMMERMAN MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 9. IC3 JAMES S. DUNLAP MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:20250SB0078PN1011 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) JAMES SCOTT DUNLAP WAS BORN JANUARY 22, 1967, AT PHILIPSBURG HOSPITAL IN PHILIPSBURG, CENTRE COUNTY, AND LATER ATTENDED PHILIPSBURG-OSCEOLA AREA HIGH SCHOOL.(2) HE ALSO ATTENDED GREAT LAKES NAVAL TRAINING CENTER IN ILLINOIS AND INTERIOR COMMUNICATIONS 'A' SCHOOL IN SAN DIEGO, CALIFORNIA.(3) HE WAS A PETTY OFFICER THIRD CLASS IN THE UNITED STATES NAVY AND SERVED AS AN INTERIOR COMMUNICATIONS ELECTRICIAN (IC3) ON BOARD THE USS STARK FFG-31 FROM NOVEMBER 1984 TO MAY 1987, STATIONED OUT OF MAYPORT BASE, JACKSONVILLE, FLORIDA.(4) ON MAY 17, 1987, PETTY OFFICER THIRD CLASS DUNLAP WAS KILLED IN ACTION ON BOARD THE USS STARK IN THE PERSIAN GULF WHEN IRAQI AIRCRAFT FIRED MISSILES AT THE SHIP.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE PORTION OF STATE ROUTE 2051 FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH ELIZABETH STREET (SEGMENT 0020/OFFSET 1600) TO THE DECATUR TOWNSHIP LINE (SEGMENT 0030/OFFSET 0000) IN OSCEOLA MILLS BOROUGH, CLEARFIELD COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE IC3 JAMES S. DUNLAP MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE DESIGNATED HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 10. SGT. RONALD BLOOM MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) RONALD BLOOM WAS BORN OCTOBER 21, 1946, IN CLEARFIELD COUNTY AND WAS THE SON OF NORMAN AND THELMA BLOOM.(2) DURING HIS FREE TIME, HE ENJOYED THE OUTDOORS, INCLUDING FISHING AND HIKING.(3) RONALD BLOOM ATTENDED SAINT FRANCIS HIGH SCHOOL IN 20250SB0078PN1011 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CLEARFIELD, HOWEVER HE DROPPED OUT DURING HIS SENIOR YEAR TO ENLIST IN THE MARINES.(4) HE ENLISTED IN THE MARINES ON MAY 27, 1967, AND ROSE TO THE RANK OF SERGEANT.(5) ON AUGUST 2, 1968, AT 21 YEARS OF AGE, SERGEANT BLOOM WAS KILLED IN ACTION IN QUANG TRI, VIETNAM.(6) DURING HIS SERVICE, SERGEANT BLOOM RECEIVED THE PURPLE HEART, THE GOOD CONDUCT MEDAL, THE NATIONAL DEFENSE SERVICE MEDAL, THE VIETNAM SERVICE MEDAL WITH TWO STARS AND THE REPUBLIC OF VIETNAM CAMPAIGN MEDAL.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 48006, CARRYING STATE ROUTE 3007 OVER CARSON RUN IN KNOX TOWNSHIP, CLEARFIELD COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE SGT. RONALD BLOOM MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 11. REPRESENTATIVE JERRY A. STERN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) JERRY ALLEN STERN WAS BORN JANUARY 11, 1955, IN ROARING SPRING, BLAIR COUNTY.(2) JERRY GRADUATED FROM CENTRAL HIGH SCHOOL IN 1972 AND ATTENDED ALTOONA SCHOOL OF COMMERCE, PENN STATE ALTOONA AND THE ALTOONA BIBLE INSTITUTE WHERE HE COMPLETED A THREE-YEAR COURSE IN BIBLE STUDIES.(3) JERRY WAS ELECTED TO THE PENNSYLVANIA HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES IN 1992 WHERE HE HONORABLY SERVED THE CONSTITUENTS OF THE 80TH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT UNTIL JANUARY 6, 2015.20250SB0078PN1011 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) REPRESENTATIVE STERN WAS A LIFETIME MEMBER OF THE MARTINSBURG GRACE BRETHREN CHURCH, WHERE HE SERVED AS A DEACON AND SUNDAY SCHOOL TEACHER AND SANG WITH THE ADULT CHOIR AND MARANATHA QUARTET.(5) REPRESENTATIVE STERN ALSO SERVED AS A LAY MINISTER FOR HIS CHURCH AND FOR MANY OTHER LOCAL CHURCHES.(6) REPRESENTATIVE STERN ALSO WAS A MEMBER OF THE MARTINSBURG SPORTSMEN'S ASSOCIATION, THE BLAIR COUNTY CHAMBER OF COMMERCE, BLAIR COUNTY FARM BUREAU AND THE BLAIR COUNTY REPUBLICAN COMMITTEE.(7) REPRESENTATIVE STERN WAS A LONGTIME MEMBER OF THE LOCAL ROTARY INTERNATIONAL, SERVING TWICE AS PRESIDENT AND AS THE ASSISTANT DISTRICT GOVERNOR.(8) REPRESENTATIVE STERN ALSO SERVED HIS COMMUNITY AS A BOARD MEMBER FOR NASON HOSPITAL AND THE HOLLIDAYSBURG AMERICAN LEGION AMBULANCE SERVICE.(9) REPRESENTATIVE STERN ALSO ENJOYED BOWLING, WHERE HE EARNED HIS PROFESSIONAL CARD, GARDENING AND PLAYING SOFTBALL AS A LONGTIME, PROUD TEAM MEMBER OF THE WORLD-FAMOUS COBRAS SOFTBALL TEAM.(10) REPRESENTATIVE STERN LOVED SPENDING TIME WITH HIS FAMILY AND SHARING HIS FAITH WITH EVERYONE HE CROSSED PATHS WITH DURING HIS DAY.(11) REPRESENTATIVE STERN PASSED AWAY ON DECEMBER 11, 2024.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE PORTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 164, COVE MOUNTAIN ROAD, FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH FREDERICK ROAD IN TAYLOR TOWNSHIP TO THE INTERSECTION WITH AGWAY ROAD IN NORTH WOODBURY TOWNSHIP, BLAIR COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE REPRESENTATIVE JERRY A. STERN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.20250SB0078PN1011 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE DESIGNATED HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 12. JACK E. AND SHELDON L. CHAMBERS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) JACK E. CHAMBERS WAS BORN JUNE 19, 1924, IN ALTOONA.(2) JACK E. CHAMBERS WAS THE SON OF HARRY AND EDNA CHAMBERS AND HAD TWO BROTHERS, HARRY AND THOMAS, AND TWO SISTERS, IRENE AND JOYCE.(3) JACK E. CHAMBERS ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES MARINES CORPS ON JUNE 14, 1942, AT THE AGE OF 17.(4) JACK E. CHAMBERS WAS STATIONED IN AUSTRALIA, NEW ZEALAND, NEW GUINEA AND GUAM.(5) JACK E. CHAMBERS ACHIEVED THE RANK OF CORPORAL, THIRD AMPHIBIAN TRACTOR BATTALION, THIRD AMPHIBIOUS CORPS, FLEET MARINE FORCE.(6) ON JULY 21, 1944, WHILE IN COMMAND OF AN AMPHIBIAN TRACTOR CREW DURING THE LANDING OF ASSAULT TROOPS ON GUAM, AND OBSERVING TWO TROOP-LOADED TRACTORS INCAPACITATED BY SHELLS FROM AN ENEMY MORTAR CONCENTRATION ON THE REEF, JACK E. CHAMBERS WITHOUT HESITATION BRAVED A HAIL OF WITHERING MORTAR FIRE AND LED HIS CREW TO THE INCAPACITATED TRACTORS, COURAGEOUSLY REMOVED THE TROOPS FROM THE WRECKAGE AND RETURNED THEM TO THE BEACH, WHERE HE WAS SUBSEQUENTLY KILLED BY HOSTILE FIRE.(7) JACK E. CHAMBERS WAS 20 YEARS OLD, AND FOR HIS DEDICATED SERVICE RECEIVED THE BRONZE STAR, PURPLE HEART, WORLD WAR II VICTORY MEDAL AND VARIOUS SERVICE MEDALS.(8) JACK E. CHAMBERS IS BURIED AT THE NATIONAL CEMETERY 20250SB0078PN1011 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF THE PACIFIC, HONOLULU, HAWAII.(9) SHELDON L. CHAMBERS WAS BORN NOVEMBER 16, 1920, IN ALTOONA.(10) SHELDON L. CHAMBERS WAS THE SON OF OSCAR AND SARAH CHAMBERS AND HAD FIVE BROTHERS, LEROY, REGINALD, ROBERT, RUSSELL AND CHARLES, AND THREE SISTERS, VERNA, AUDREY AND JANET.(11) SHELDON L. CHAMBERS ATTENDED ALTOONA HIGH SCHOOL, GRADUATING IN 1939.(12) SHELDON L. CHAMBERS ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY AIR FORCE IN JUNE 1939 FOLLOWING GRADUATION FROM HIGH SCHOOL.(13) SHELDON L. CHAMBERS SERVED AS A FLIGHT OFFICER/CO-PILOT IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY AIR FORCE, 308TH BOMBER GROUP, HEAVY, 425TH BOMBER SQUADRON.(14) ON JANUARY 25, 1944, SHELDON L. CHAMBERS WAS ON THE CREW OF THE B-24J LIBERATOR #42-73308, NICKNAMED "HOT AS HELL," WHEN THE CREW TOOK OFF FROM KUNMING AIRFIELD IN CHINA DURING A ROUTINE FLIGHT TO CHABUA AIRFIELD IN INDIA, WHERE THE CREW WAS REPORTED MISSING WITH NO TRACE AND OFFICIALLY DECLARED DEAD ON JANUARY 26, 1946.(15) ON DECEMBER 7, 2006, THE WRECK OF "HOT AS HELL" WAS LOCATED IN DAMRAH, ARUNCHAL PRADESH STATE, INDIA BY CLAYTON KUHLES.(16) FOR HIS DEDICATED SERVICE, SHELDON L. CHAMBERS WAS AWARDED THE AIR MEDAL, PURPLE HEART, UNITED STATES AVIATOR BADGE ARMY, WORLD WAR II VICTORY MEDAL, AMERICAN CAMPAIGN MEDAL, ARMY PRESIDENTIAL UNIT CITATION, ARMY GOOD CONDUCT MEDAL AND ASIATIC-PACIFIC CAMPAIGN MEDAL.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEYS 20250SB0078PN1011 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 5599/5600, CARRYING INTERSTATE 99 OVER PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 36 IN LOGAN TOWNSHIP, BLAIR COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE JACK E. AND SHELDON L. CHAMBERS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 13. PFC PAUL A. GILBERT MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDING.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) PAUL A. GILBERT WAS BORN MAY 31, 1945, IN SOMERSET, SOMERSET COUNTY.(2) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS GILBERT ATTENDED JENNER-BOSWELL JOINT HIGH SCHOOL IN BOSWELL, SOMERSET COUNTY, AND PARTICIPATED IN BOY SCOUTS.(3) BEFORE GRADUATING FROM HIGH SCHOOL, PRIVATE FIRST CLASS GILBERT BEGAN HIS SERVICE IN THE SEABEES IN THE UNITED STATES NAVY BEFORE ENLISTING IN THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS IN NOVEMBER 1964.(4) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS GILBERT SERVED IN COMPANY L, 3RD BATTALION, 9TH MARINE REGIMENT, 3RD MARINE DIVISION, AND RECEIVED A PURPLE HEART DURING HIS SERVICE.(5) ON FEBRUARY 19, 1966, PRIVATE FIRST CLASS PAUL A. GILBERT WAS KILLED IN ACTION IN QUANG NAM PROVINCE, VIETNAM.(6) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS PAUL A. GILBERT IS FOREVER MEMORIALIZED ON PANEL 5E, LINE 50, LOCATED IN WASHINGTON, DC, ON THE VIETNAM VETERANS MEMORIAL.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 31496, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 985 OVER NORTH BRANCH QUEMAHONING CREEK IN JENNER TOWNSHIP, SOMERSET COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE PFC PAUL A. GILBERT MEMORIAL BRIDGE.20250SB0078PN1011 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 14. PFC CHARLES O. SNYDER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) CHARLES O. SNYDER WAS BORN IN MONROE TOWNSHIP, BEDFORD COUNTY, ON MARCH 4, 1950.(2) PFC SNYDER WAS A GRADUATE OF EVERETT AREA HIGH SCHOOL.(3) PFC SNYDER ENJOYED READING BOOKS ON THE TOPIC OF HISTORY, SPECIFICALLY MILITARY HISTORY.(4) PFC SNYDER SERVED AS A MEMBER OF THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS FROM AUGUST 1968 TO MARCH 1969.(5) PFC SNYDER WAS ASSIGNED TO THE 1ST COMPANY, 3RD BATTALION, 1ST MARINE DIVISION, ACHIEVING THE RANK OF PRIVATE FIRST CLASS.(6) PFC SNYDER WAS KILLED IN ACTION ON MARCH 28, 1969, IN VIETNAM.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 4262, CARRYING STATE ROUTE 2016 OVER SHAFFER CREEK IN EAST PROVIDENCE TOWNSHIP, BEDFORD COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE PFC CHARLES O. SNYDER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 15. JANICE BUTKO CMAR MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) JANICE R. "JAN" BUTKO CMAR WAS BORN NOVEMBER 10, 20250SB0078PN1011 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1954, TO EDWARD M. BUTKO AND RUTH PICKARD BUTKO.(2) MRS. CMAR EARNED HER BACHELOR OF SCIENCE DEGREE FROM MANSFIELD UNIVERSITY, WHERE SHE JOINED THE ALPHA SIGMA TAU SORORITY. SHE FURTHERED HER EDUCATION BY ATTAINING A MASTER'S DEGREE IN SPECIAL EDUCATION FROM DUQUESNE UNIVERSITY.(3) MRS. CMAR'S PASSION FOR TEACHING LED TO A 35-YEAR CAREER AS A HOME ECONOMICS TEACHER, EVENTUALLY RETIRING FROM THE PETERS TOWNSHIP SCHOOL DISTRICT.(4) IN 1991, MRS. CMAR SERVED AS THE PRESIDENT OF THE ALLEGHENY COUNTY CHAPTER OF THE PENNSYLVANIA HOME ECONOMICS ASSOCIATION.(5) MRS. CMAR CONTINUED TO CONTRIBUTE TO EDUCATION AS THE PRESIDENT OF THE LOCAL DELTA KAPPA GAMMA CHAPTER, AN INTERNATIONAL SOCIETY FOR KEY WOMEN EDUCATORS.(6) MRS. CMAR WAS ELECTED TO THE JEFFERSON HILLS BOROUGH COUNCIL FOUR TIMES, SERVING FOR 16 YEARS.(7) MRS. CMAR WAS ELECTED TO TWO TERMS AS MAYOR OF JEFFERSON HILLS BOROUGH, SERVING FOR EIGHT YEARS.(8) MRS. CMAR LED A DEDICATED LIFE OF PUBLIC SERVICE TO HER COMMUNITY AND HER CHURCH.(9) MRS. CMAR CODEVELOPED THE JEFFERSON HILLS BOROUGH'S INAUGURAL WEB PAGE, INITIATED ITS MILITARY BANNER PROGRAM, ORCHESTRATED THE JEFFERSON HILLS BOROUGH'S SUMMER PROGRAM, ASSISTED IN DESIGNATING JEFFERSON HILLS AS AN ALLEGHENY COUNTY BANNER MUNICIPALITY AND CREATED THE JEFFERSON HILLS BOROUGH'S ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY BOARD.(10) AS MAYOR OF JEFFERSON HILLS, MRS. CMAR OFFICIATED 35 WEDDING CEREMONIES.(11) MRS. CMAR WAS A DEDICATED MEMBER OF THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE MAYORS' ASSOCIATION, SERVING AS BOARD 20250SB0078PN1011 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECRETARY FOR SIX YEARS.(12) MRS. CMAR CONTRIBUTED AS A BOARD MEMBER OF THE ALLEGHENY COUNTY BOROUGHS ASSOCIATION.(13) MRS. CMAR RECEIVED TWO PRESTIGIOUS AWARDS FROM THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE ASSOCIATION OF BOROUGHS, THE CECIL K. LEBERKNIGHT AWARD AND THE THOMAS F. CHROSTWAITE AWARD.(14) MRS. CMAR WAS A MEMBER OF TRIUMPH OF THE HOLY CROSS PARISH, WHERE SHE REGULARLY VOLUNTEERED AT VARIOUS PARISH EVENTS.(15) MRS. CMAR SERVED AS A MEMBER OF THE FLOREFFE FIRE HALL LADIES AUXILIARY, THE JEFFERSON HOSPITAL AUXILIARY AND THE WEST JEFFERSON HILLS CHAMBER OF COMMERCE AND HAD A DISTINGUISHED LIFETIME MEMBERSHIP OF THE GILL HALL VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY.(16) MRS. CMAR'S LIFE OF SERVICE, LEADERSHIP AND UNWAVERING DEDICATION CREATED AN UNDENIABLE POSITIVE IMPACT ON HER COMMUNITY.(17) JANICE R. "JAN" BUTKO CMAR PASSED AWAY JANUARY 6, 2024.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 1723, CARRYING STATE ROUTE 3017 OVER PETERS CREEK IN THE BOROUGH OF JEFFERSON HILLS, ALLEGHENY COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE JANICE BUTKO CMAR MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 16. ROGER LEE FRAKER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) ROGER LEE FRAKER WAS BORN MAY 23, 1949, IN CARLISLE 20250SB0078PN1011 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TO FRANK W. AND BEATRICE R. FRAKER.(2) MR. FRAKER WAS THE THIRD CHILD IN A FAMILY OF SIX CHILDREN, HAVING ONE OLDER BROTHER, BILL; ONE YOUNGER BROTHER, STEVE; ONE OLDER SISTER, BEVERLY; AND TWO YOUNGER SISTERS, LINDA AND CONNIE.(3) MR. FRAKER WAS A GRADUATE OF EASTERN YORK HIGH SCHOOL IN THE CLASS OF 1967.(4) MR. FRAKER GREATLY ENJOYED READING, PLAYING THE GUITAR WITH HIS BROTHERS, HELPING ON THE FAMILY FARM AND SHOWING HIS PIGS IN THE LOCAL FUTURE FARMERS OF AMERICA AND 4-H CLUB.(5) MR. FRAKER BRAVELY SERVED HIS COUNTRY DURING THE VIETNAM WAR, ENTERING THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS ON AUGUST 24, 1967, AND WAS SENT TO VIETNAM ON JANUARY 29, 1968.(6) MR. FRAKER WAS STATIONED WITH THE WEAPONS PLATOON OF COMPANY K, 3RD MARINES, 3RD MARINE DIVISION IN QUANG TRI PROVINCE.(7) MR. FRAKER WAS KILLED IN ACTION ON AUGUST 27, 1968, BY A BARRAGE OF ENEMY ARTILLERY FIRE ON A HILL IN QUANG TRI PROVINCE, WHEN HE WAS 19 YEARS OF AGE.(8) MR. FRAKER ACHIEVED THE RANK OF PRIVATE FIRST CLASS IN HIS SERVICE TO THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS AND WAS AWARDED THE NATIONAL DEFENSE, VIETNAM CAMPAIGN, VIETNAM SERVICE, VIETNAM MILITARY MERIT, VIETNAMESE GALLANTRY CROSS, GOOD CONDUCT AND PURPLE HEART MEDALS.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 37601, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 462 OVER A TRIBUTARY OF KREUTZ CREEK IN HELLAM TOWNSHIP, YORK COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE ROGER LEE FRAKER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND 20250SB0078PN1011 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 17. CRAIG WALKER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) RODNEY CRAIG WALKER WAS BORN JANUARY 31, 1959, IN HUNTINGDON TO ROBERT C. "DIX" WALKER AND JEAN M. WALKER.(2) MR. WALKER GRADUATED FROM JUNIATA VALLEY HIGH SCHOOL IN 1976 AND STUDIED AUTO BODY REPAIR DURING HIGH SCHOOL AT THE GREATER ALTOONA CAREER AND TECHNOLOGY CENTER.(3) MR. WALKER MARRIED ROSE M. ST. GERMAIN AT THE FIRST PRESBYTERIAN CHURCH IN ALEXANDRIA ON JULY 26, 1980.(4) CRAIG AND ROSIE WERE MARRIED FOR 44 YEARS AND HAD TWO CHILDREN, WENDY AND RYAN.(5) MR. WALKER WAS EMPLOYED BY PENNDOT AS A DIESEL AND CONSTRUCTION EQUIPMENT MECHANIC FOR 18 YEARS.(6) MR. WALKER HAD A GREAT LOVE FOR HIS CLASSIC 1969 CHEVROLET CAMARO Z/28 AND BEING PART OF THE CLASSIC CAR GANG.(7) MR. WALKER COULD FIX NEARLY ANYTHING AND WAS WELL-KNOWN IN THE AREA FOR HIS BREEZEWAY BODY SHOP.(8) MR. WALKER ENJOYED BEING OUTDOORS, SPENDING TIME AT HIS SWIMMING POOL, KAYAKING, RIDING ATVS AND VISITING THE BEACH. HE WAS AN AVID FAN OF PENN STATE WRESTLING AND FOOTBALL AND THE PITTSBURGH STEELERS.(9) MR. WALKER WAS A DEVOTED HUSBAND, FATHER AND GRANDFATHER WHO DEEPLY CHERISHED HIS WIFE AND CHILDREN AND ADORED SPENDING TIME WITH HIS GRANDCHILDREN.(10) MR. WALKER PASSED AWAY AUGUST 30, 2024, FROM COMPLICATIONS INVOLVING A WORK ACCIDENT ON DECEMBER 7, 2023.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 20250SB0078PN1011 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 18630, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 305 OVER THE FRANKSTOWN BRANCH OF THE JUNIATA RIVER IN ALEXANDRIA BOROUGH, HUNTINGDON COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE CRAIG WALKER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 18. MASTER SERGEANT ROBERT F. JOHNSON MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) ROBERT F. "BOBBY" JOHNSON WAS BORN JULY 21, 1929.(2) MASTER SERGEANT JOHNSON WAS THE SON OF GEORGE S. AND ALICE KNARR JOHNSON.(3) MASTER SERGEANT JOHNSON WAS A VETERAN OF THE UNITED STATES AIR FORCE, ENLISTING IN 1947 AND RETIRING IN 1969 AS A MASTER SERGEANT.(4) MASTER SERGEANT JOHNSON WAS INITIALLY ASSIGNED TO AN AIR POLICE SQUADRON DURING THE BERLIN AIRLIFT AND SUBSEQUENTLY APPLIED FOR PARARESCUE TRAINING AND SPENT THE NEXT 20 YEARS AS A RESCUE PARACHUTIST AND DIVER ASSIGNED TO THE AEROSPACE RESCUE AND RECOVERY SERVICE.(5) MASTER SERGEANT JOHNSON MADE MORE THAN 350 PARACHUTE JUMPS DURING HIS CAREER AND PARTICIPATED IN RESCUE OPERATIONS IN AFRICA, THE MIDDLE EAST, ASIA AND THE UNITED STATES.(6) MASTER SERGEANT JOHNSON WAS ASSIGNED TO SUPPORT NASA'S MERCURY AND GEMINI SPACEFLIGHT PROGRAMS, PARACHUTING AND DIVING TO RECOVER NASA EQUIPMENT AND SPACE CAPSULES.(7) WHEN THE GEMINI III SPACE CAPSULE SPLASHED DOWN INTO THE ATLANTIC OCEAN ON MARCH 23, 1965, BRINGING ASTRONAUTS VIRGIL "GUS" GRISSOM AND JOHN YOUNG SAFELY BACK TO EARTH, MASTER SERGEANT JOHNSON WAS THE FIRST DIVER TO REACH THE 20250SB0078PN1011 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CAPSULE.(8) MASTER SERGEANT JOHNSON'S AWARDS AND QUALIFICATIONS INCLUDED THE MASTER PARACHUTIST AND ENLISTED AIRCREW BADGES, DIVE BADGE, AIR FORCE COMMENDATION MEDAL, AIR FORCE OUTSTANDING UNIT AWARD AND GOOD CONDUCT MEDAL.(9) MASTER SERGEANT JOHNSON WAS A LIFE MEMBER OF THE WAYNE TOWNSHIP FIRE DEPARTMENT AND INVOLVED IN MANY OTHER ORGANIZATIONS.(10) ROBERT F. JOHNSON PASSED AWAY AT HIS HOME IN YOUNGDALE ON FEBRUARY 2, 2022, AT THE AGE OF 92.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 12334, CARRYING STATE ROUTE 2012 OVER MCELHATTAN CREEK IN WAYNE TOWNSHIP, CLINTON COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE MASTER SERGEANT ROBERT F. JOHNSON MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 19. EARLE CHANDLER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) EARLE JAMES CHANDLER WAS BORN ON JUNE 23, 1958, IN BUTLER, BUTLER COUNTY.(2) MR. CHANDLER GRADUATED FROM REDBANK VALLEY HIGH SCHOOL IN 1976 AND WAS AN ENGINEERING GRADUATE FROM PENN STATE UNIVERSITY.(3) MR. CHANDLER LOVED THE LORD, HAD A BEAUTIFUL SINGING VOICE, SANG IN HIS CHURCH CHOIR AND A BARBER SHOP QUARTET. HE LOVED THE PITTSBURGH STEELERS, GOLF, PENN STATE AND HAD A GREAT SENSE OF HUMOR.(4) MR. CHANDLER WAS MARRIED TO ELIZABETH AND HAD THREE 20250SB0078PN1011 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DAUGHTERS, EMILY, ERIN AND ERICA.(5) MR. CHANDLER WAS A DEDICATED MEMBER OF THE PENNDOT DISTRICT 1 CONSTRUCTION TEAM FOR 20 YEARS.(6) AT THE TIME OF HIS DEATH, MR. CHANDLER WAS WORKING AS A TRANSPORTATION CONSTRUCTION INSPECTOR (TCI) AT A WORK SITE ON STATE ROUTE 8 IN ERIE COUNTY.(7) EARLE WAS KILLED AUGUST 1, 2006, IN THE LINE OF DUTY WHEN HE WAS STRUCK BY A CONSTRUCTION TRUCK AT THE WORK SITE.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 33747, CARRYING US ROUTE 322 OVER SUGAR CREEK IN SUGARCREEK BOROUGH, VENANGO COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE EARLE CHANDLER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS OF THE BRIDGE.SECTION 20. COLONEL DANIEL L. RUBINI MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) COLONEL DANIEL LAWRENCE "LARRY" RUBINI SERVED WITH DISTINCTION IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY RESERVES FOR OVER THREE DECADES AS A JUDGE ADVOCATE GENERAL AND CIVIL AFFAIRS OFFICER.(2) COLONEL RUBINI GRADUATED FROM VIRGINIA POLYTECHNIC INSTITUTE IN 1968. COLONEL RUBINI LATER EARNED A JURIS DOCTOR DEGREE FROM TEMPLE UNIVERSITY LAW SCHOOL WHILE ALSO EARNING HIS ARMOR SPECIALTY UNDER THE LEADERSHIP OF BRIGADIER GENERAL GEORGE S. PATTON IV. COLONEL RUBINI PRACTICED LAW IN RICHBORO FOR 22 YEARS AND THEN SERVED AS A UNITED STATES ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE FOR 24 YEARS WHILE PURSUING A FULL CAREER AS AN ARMY RESERVE OFFICER.20250SB0078PN1011 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) COLONEL RUBINI WAS THE FATHER OF TWO SONS DJ AND JEFFREY RUBINI, AS WELL AS A GRANDFATHER OF GWEN, JANE AND JOHN RUBINI, AND BELOVED HUSBAND OF 53 YEARS TO JOAN HARTMANN RUBINI.(4) COLONEL RUBINI'S NOTABLE DEPLOYMENTS INCLUDE OPERATION DESERT SHIELD/DESERT STORM IN 1991/92 AS ADVISOR TO THE KUWAIT MINISTRY OF JUSTICE; HAITI IN 1994 AS MINISTRY OF JUSTICE ADVISOR AND ON LATER HAITI MISSIONS AS THE MINISTRY OF JUSTICE TEAM CHIEF FROM 1995 TO 1997; AND CENTRAL AMERICA IN 1999 AS CHIEF OF CIVIL AFFAIRS IN SUPPORT OF UNITED STATES SOUTHERN COMMAND'S RESPONSE TO THE HUMANITARIAN CRISIS FOLLOWING HURRICANE MITCH. HE WAS INSTRUMENTAL IN THE ESTABLISHMENT OF WASHINGTON CROSSING NATIONAL CEMETERY IN BUCKS COUNTY.(5) COLONEL RUBINI WAS NAMED A CIVIL AFFAIRS DISTINGUISHED MEMBER OF THE REGIMENT BY THE UNITED STATES ARMY SPECIAL OPERATIONS COMMAND. ADDITIONALLY, CIVIL AFFAIRS ISSUE PAPERS PRESIDENT MAJ. GEN. (RET.) HUGH VAN ROOSEN HAS DIRECTED DEDICATION OF THE UPCOMING 10TH VOLUME OF THE CIVIL AFFAIRS ISSUE PAPERS TO THE LATE COL. (RET.) LARRY RUBINI.(6) COLONEL DANIEL LAWRENCE "LARRY" RUBINI PASSED AWAY PEACEFULLY DECEMBER 31, 2023. ALONG WITH HIS WIFE JOAN, COLONEL RUBINI IS SURVIVED BY HIS TWO SONS, DJ RUBINI AND HIS WIFE LEA; JEFFREY RUBINI AND HIS WIFE JULIET; GRANDCHILDREN GWEN RUBINI, JANE RUBINI AND JOHN RUBINI; SISTERS GAIL SUKERNICK AND LYNN RUBINI, AS WELL AS MANY EXTENDED FAMILY MEMBERS.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 69027, CARRYING WORTHINGTON MILL ROAD OVER NESHAMINY CREEK IN WRIGHTSTOWN TOWNSHIP, BUCKS COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE COLONEL 20250SB0078PN1011 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DANIEL L. RUBINI MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS OF THE BRIDGE.SECTION 21. JOSEPH MCGRANAGHAN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) JOSEPH A. MCGRANAGHAN WAS BORN JULY 20, 1943.(2) MR. MCGRANAGHAN IS A 1961 GRADUATE FROM WILLIAM PENN HIGH SCHOOL IN HARRISBURG AND ATTENDED MILLERSVILLE STATE TEACHERS COLLEGE.(3) AS A PUBLIC SERVANT, MR. MCGRANAGHAN SERVED AS AN ELECTED COUNCILMAN IN CHAMBERSBURG FOR FOUR YEARS AND IN SHAMOKIN DAM BOROUGH FOR 20 YEARS, WHERE HE WAS APPOINTED AS MAYOR IN 2009, A POSITION HE HELD UNTIL HIS DEATH.(4) MR. MCGRANAGHAN WAS ALSO THE PRESIDENT OF THE SUSQUEHANNA INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION AND THE PRESIDENT OF THE GREATER SUSQUEHANNA VALLEY CHAMBER OF COMMERCE.(5) MR. MCGRANAGHAN CHAIRED THE SUSQUEHANNA VALLEY CHAMBER'S TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE AND THE CENTRAL SUSQUEHANNA THRUWAY TASK FORCE WHERE HE WORKED TO AND SUCCESSFULLY SECURED FUNDING FOR THE ROUTES 11 AND 15 BYPASS PROJECT.(6) MR. MCGRANAGHAN WAS AWARDED THE 1992 OUTSTANDING LEADERSHIP AWARD BY THE CENTRAL SUSQUEHANNA VALLEY CHAMBER OF COMMERCE AND THE 2002 STAR OF EXCELLENCE AWARD BY THE GREATER SUSQUEHANNA VALLEY CHAMBER OF COMMERCE.(7) MR. MCGRANAGHAN ALSO HAD A CAREER IN BROADCASTING THAT BEGAN WHEN HE WAS A JUNIOR IN HIGH SCHOOL.20250SB0078PN1011 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) IN 1978, MR. MCGRANAGHAN BECAME THE EXECUTIVE VICE PRESIDENT OF SUNBURY BROADCASTING CORPORATION AND THE GENERAL MANAGER OF ITS RADIO STATIONS, WKOK-AM AND WKOK-FM.(9) MR. MCGRANAGHAN WAS APPOINTED PRESIDENT AND CHIEF OPERATING OFFICER OF THE SUNBURY BROADCASTING CORPORATION IN 1994, AND IN 2003, HE BECAME PRESIDENT OF THE MEDIA SERVICES DIVISION.(10) MR. MCGRANAGHAN SERVED AS CHAIRMAN OF THE RADIO BOARD OF DIRECTORS AND CHAIRMAN OF THE JOINT RADIO/TELEVISION BOARD OF DIRECTORS FOR THE PENNSYLVANIA ASSOCIATION OF BROADCASTERS, WHERE HE WAS NAMED THE 1994 PENNSYLVANIA BROADCASTER OF THE YEAR.(11) AFTER MORE THAN 30 YEARS IN BROADCASTING, MR. MCGRANAGHAN RETIRED IN 2008, BUT CONTINUED TO HOST THE POPULAR PUBLIC AFFAIRS CALL-IN SHOW, "ON THE MARK" ON WKOK.(12) IN 2011, MR. MCGRANAGHAN WAS INDUCTED INTO THE PENNSYLVANIA BROADCASTING HALL OF FAME.(13) MR. MCGRANAGHAN WAS KNOWN FOR HIS LOVE OF BROADCASTING, PUBLIC SERVICE AND HIS FAMILY AND LEFT AN INDELIBLE MARK ON HIS COMMUNITY.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE PORTION OF U.S. ROUTE 15 IN MONROE TOWNSHIP AND SHAMOKIN DAM BOROUGH, SNYDER COUNTY, FROM ITS INTERCHANGE WITH EXISTING U.S. ROUTES 11/15 AND U.S. ROUTE 522 NORTH OF SELINSGROVE TO ITS INTERCHANGE WITH EXISTING U.S. ROUTE 15 AND PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 147 SOUTH OF WINFIELD IS DESIGNATED AS THE JOSEPH MCGRANAGHAN MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 22. POTCHAK BROTHERS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.20250SB0078PN1011 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) STEPHEN POTCHAK, JOHN POTCHAK, MICHAEL POTCHAK, FRANK POTCHAK, CHARLES POTCHAK AND PETER POTCHAK WERE BROTHERS.(2) STEPHEN POTCHAK WAS BORN FEBRUARY 18, 1914, IN WILMORE, CAMBRIA COUNTY, AND ATTENDED WILMORE HIGH SCHOOL.(3) HE WAS DRAFTED INTO THE UNITED STATES ARMY ON FEBRUARY 5, 1942, AND SERVED DURING WORLD WAR II.(4) STEPHEN POTCHAK SERVED AS A MEDICAL ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST IN THE ARMY AIR CORPS AND RECEIVED THE FOLLOWING AWARDS AND RECOGNITIONS: AMERICAN CAMPAIGN MEDAL, GOOD CONDUCT MEDAL AND WORLD WAR II VICTORY MEDAL.(5) HE WAS HONORABLY DISCHARGED FROM THE UNITED STATES ARMY WITH THE RANK OF STAFF SERGEANT ON DECEMBER 1, 1946, AT ANDREWS FIELD IN WASHINGTON, DC.(6) AFTER THE WAR, STEPHEN POTCHAK WAS EMPLOYED FOR A TIME AT SAINT FRANCIS UNIVERSITY BEFORE WORKING AS A COAL MINER IN WILMORE. LATER IN LIFE, STEPHEN MOVED TO PHILADELPHIA, WHERE HE WORKED AS A LABORER FOR THE BUDD COMPANY BEFORE WORKING AS A LOCOMOTIVE OPERATOR FOR MORE THAN 30 YEARS AT US STEEL, FROM WHICH HE RETIRED.(7) STEPHEN POTCHAK PASSED AWAY ON MARCH 28, 1994, AND IS BURIED AT RESURRECTION CEMETERY IN BENSALEM, BUCKS COUNTY.(8) JOHN POTCHAK WAS BORN SEPTEMBER 18, 1918, IN WILMORE AND ATTENDED WILMORE HIGH SCHOOL.(9) HE ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES NAVY ON JUNE 19, 1939, AND SERVED DURING WORLD WAR II.(10) JOHN POTCHAK WAS ASSIGNED TO THE FOLLOWING VESSELS AND STATIONS: NAVAL TRAINING STATION NEWPORT, RHODE ISLAND; 20250SB0078PN1011 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 USS HELENA; USS TICONDEROGA (CV-14) AND USS CABOT.(11) HE WAS ASSIGNED TO THE USS HELENA DURING THE ATTACK ON PEARL HARBOR, BUT WAS NOT ON BOARD DURING THE ATTACK.(12) JOHN POTCHAK RECEIVED THE FOLLOWING AWARDS AND RECOGNITIONS: ASIATIC-PACIFIC CAMPAIGN MEDAL WITH NINE STARS; AMERICAN CAMPAIGN MEDAL; AMERICAN DEFENSE SERVICE MEDAL WITH ONE STAR; PHILIPPINE LIBERATION MEDAL WITH ONE STAR; GOOD CONDUCT MEDAL; WORLD WAR II VICTORY MEDAL; NAVY UNIT COMMENDATION RIBBON BAR; AND PHILIPPINE PRESIDENTIAL UNIT CITATION.(13) HE WAS HONORABLY DISCHARGED FROM THE UNITED STATES NAVY WITH THE RANK OF CHIEF ELECTRICIAN'S MATE ON NOVEMBER 28, 1945, AT THE UNITED STATES NAVAL PERSONNEL SEPARATION CENTER IN SAMPSON, NEW YORK.(14) AFTER THE WAR, JOHN POTCHAK WORKED AS AN ENGINEER AT THE JOHNSVILLE NAVAL AIR DEVELOPMENT CENTER IN WARMINSTER, BUCKS COUNTY, WAS A LIFETIME MEMBER OF THE WARMINSTER VETERANS OF FOREIGN WARS POST 6493 IN WARMINSTER AND WAS A DEDICATED MEMBER OF HIS CHURCH, SAINT CYRIL OF JERUSALEM CATHOLIC CHURCH, IN JAMISON, BUCKS COUNTY. HE ENJOYED HUNTING AND FISHING IN HIS FREE TIME.(15) JOHN POTCHAK PASSED AWAY ON MAY 12, 2010, AND IS BURIED AT SAINT JOHN NEUMANN CEMETERY IN CHALFONT, BUCKS COUNTY.(16) MICHAEL POTCHAK WAS BORN OCTOBER 15, 1920, IN WILMORE AND ATTENDED WILMORE HIGH SCHOOL.(17) HE ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES NAVY ON DECEMBER 15, 1942, AND SERVED DURING WORLD WAR II.(18) MICHAEL POTCHAK WAS ASSIGNED TO THE FOLLOWING VESSELS AND STATIONS: USS BATAAN AND U.S. NAVAL TRAINING 20250SB0078PN1011 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CENTER BAINBRIDGE, MARYLAND.(19) HE RECEIVED THE FOLLOWING AWARDS AND RECOGNITIONS: ASIATIC-PACIFIC CAMPAIGN MEDAL WITH FIVE STARS; AMERICAN CAMPAIGN MEDAL; GOOD CONDUCT MEDAL; WORLD WAR II VICTORY MEDAL; PHILIPPINES LIBERATION MEDAL; AND IMPERIUM NEPTUNI REGIS.(20) MICHAEL POTCHAK WAS HONORABLY DISCHARGED FROM THE UNITED STATES NAVY WITH THE RANK OF ELECTRICIAN'S MATE FIRST CLASS ON MARCH 5, 1946, AT THE U.S. NAVAL PERSONNEL SEPARATION CENTER IN BAINBRIDGE, MARYLAND.(21) AFTER THE WAR, HE WORKED FOR AND RETIRED FROM US STEEL IN JOHNSTOWN, CAMBRIA COUNTY, WHERE HE WAS AN ELECTRICAL FOREMAN.(22) MICHAEL POTCHAK PASSED AWAY ON FEBRUARY 2, 2009, AND IS BURIED AT THE RICHLAND MAUSOLEUM IN JOHNSTOWN.(23) FRANK POTCHAK WAS BORN NOVEMBER 13, 1922, IN WILMORE AND ATTENDED WILMORE HIGH SCHOOL.(24) HE ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES NAVY ON FEBRUARY 23, 1943, AND SERVED DURING WORLD WAR II.(25) FRANK POTCHAK WAS ASSIGNED TO THE FOLLOWING VESSELS AND STATIONS: USS KALININ BAY; U.S. NAVAL TRAINING AND DISTRIBUTION CENTER SHOEMAKER, CALIFORNIA; S.S. JACOB LUCKENBACH; S.S. JANET LORD ROPER; U.S. NAVY ARMED GUARD CENTER BROOKLYN, NEW YORK; U.S. NAVY ARMED GUARD CENTER LITTLE CREEK, VIRGINIA; AND U.S. NAVAL TRAINING STATION SAMPSON, NEW YORK.(26) HE RECEIVED THE FOLLOWING AWARDS AND RECOGNITIONS: AMERICAN CAMPAIGN MEDAL; EUROPEAN-AFRICAN-MIDDLE EASTERN CAMPAIGN MEDAL; ASIATIC-PACIFIC CAMPAIGN MEDAL; WORLD WAR II VICTORY MEDAL; AND GOOD CONDUCT MEDAL.20250SB0078PN1011 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (27) FRANK POTCHAK WAS HONORABLY DISCHARGED FROM THE UNITED STATES NAVY WITH THE RANK OF SEAMAN FIRST CLASS ON FEBRUARY 17, 1946, AT THE U.S. NAVAL PERSONNEL SEPARATION CENTER IN SAMPSON, NEW YORK.(28) AFTER THE WAR, HE MARRIED HIS WIFE, EVELYN AND LATER, THEY AND THEIR CHILDREN MOVED TO BUCKS COUNTY, WHERE HE WORKED AT U-HAUL FOR 28 YEARS.(29) FRANK POTCHAK PASSED AWAY ON NOVEMBER 5, 2000, AND IS BURIED AT SAINT JOHN NEUMANN CEMETERY IN CHALFONT.(30) CHARLES POTCHAK WAS BORN DECEMBER 26, 1924, IN WILMORE AND ATTENDED WILMORE HIGH SCHOOL.(31) HE ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY ON JULY 12, 1943, AND SERVED DURING WORLD WAR II.(32) CHARLES POTCHAK WAS ASSIGNED TO BATTERY C, 55TH FIELD ARTILLERY BATTALION AND FOUGHT IN THE NEW GUINEA CAMPAIGN AND THE BATTLE OF LUZON.(33) HE RECEIVED THE FOLLOWING AWARDS AND RECOGNITIONS: GOOD CONDUCT MEDAL; PHILIPPINES LIBERATION MEDAL WITH ONE BRONZE STAR; AMERICAN CAMPAIGN MEDAL; ASIATIC-PACIFIC CAMPAIGN MEDAL WITH TWO BRONZE STARS; AND WORLD WAR II VICTORY MEDAL.(34) CHARLES POTCHAK WAS HONORABLY DISCHARGED FROM THE UNITED STATES ARMY WITH THE RANK OF CORPORAL ON FEBRUARY 9, 1946, AT THE INDIANTOWN GAP MILITARY RESERVATION, LEBANON COUNTY.(35) AFTER THE WAR, HE WORKED IN A MINE IN BEAVERDALE, CAMBRIA COUNTY, AND WAS LATER EMPLOYED AT US STEEL IN JOHNSTOWN. HE MARRIED THE FORMER DOROTHY MITCHELL AND THEY RAISED FOUR CHILDREN IN THE BEAVERDALE-SIDMAN AREA OF CAMBRIA COUNTY.20250SB0078PN1011 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (36) CHARLES POTCHAK PASSED AWAY ON FEBRUARY 20, 2012, AND IS BURIED AT ST. MICHAEL CEMETERY IN ST. MICHAEL, CAMBRIA COUNTY.(37) PETER POTCHAK WAS BORN JULY 1, 1926, IN WILMORE AND ATTENDED WILMORE HIGH SCHOOL.(38) HE WAS DRAFTED INTO THE UNITED STATES ARMY ON NOVEMBER 15, 1944, AND SERVED DURING WORLD WAR II.(39) PETER POTCHAK WAS ASSIGNED TO HEADQUARTERS COMPANY, 86TH CHEMICAL MORTAR BATTALION AND FOUGHT IN THE RHINELAND CAMPAIGN.(40) HE RECEIVED THE FOLLOWING AWARDS AND RECOGNITIONS: DISTINGUISHED UNIT BADGE WITH OAK LEAF CLUSTER; GOOD CONDUCT MEDAL; WORLD WAR II VICTORY MEDAL; AND EUROPEAN-AFRICAN-MIDDLE EASTERN CAMPAIGN MEDAL WITH ONE BRONZE SERVICE STAR.(41) PETER POTCHAK WAS HONORABLY DISCHARGED FROM THE UNITED STATES ARMY WITH THE RANK OF TECHNICIAN FIFTH GRADE ON DECEMBER 29, 1945, AT THE SEPARATION CENTER IN FORT KNOX, KENTUCKY.(42) AFTER THE WAR, HE RETURNED HOME TO WILMORE, TOOK CARE OF HIS FATHER UNTIL HIS FATHER'S DEATH, WORKED FOR AND RETIRED FROM US STEEL IN JOHNSTOWN AND WAS LAST EMPLOYED AS AN ELECTRICAL STORES KEEPER. HE WAS A MEMBER OF AMERICAN LEGION POST 430, A CHARTER MEMBER OF THE WILMORE VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY AND A MEMBER OF THE FORMER GBU: SUMMER HILL, NOW A DISTRICT OF THE GBU FOUNDATION.(43) PETER POTCHAK PASSED AWAY ON MAY 9, 1998, AND IS BURIED AT SAINTS PETER AND PAUL CEMETERY IN PORTAGE, CAMBRIA COUNTY.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 8430, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 160 OVER THE NORTH BRANCH LITTLE 20250SB0078PN1011 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONEMAUGH RIVER IN THE BOROUGH OF WILMORE, CAMBRIA COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE POTCHAK BROTHERS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 23. KENNETH C. LARSON, JR., MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) KENNETH C. LARSON, JR., WAS BORN APRIL 26, 1934.(2) MR. LARSON WAS A DISTINGUISHED ENGINEER, VISIONARY LEADER AND PASSIONATE ADVOCATE FOR INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS IN THE NORTHERN TIER REGION.(3) MR. LARSON DEDICATED HIS CAREER TO ADVANCING TRANSPORTATION SYSTEMS THAT ENHANCED SAFETY, EFFICIENCY AND ECONOMIC VITALITY FOR THE NORTHERN TIER REGION AND BEYOND.(4) MR. LARSON'S EXPERTISE AND UNWAVERING COMMITMENT CONTRIBUTED SIGNIFICANTLY TO THE DESIGN AND DEVELOPMENT OF KEY TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS THAT HAVE POSITIVELY IMPACTED THE LIVES OF COUNTLESS INDIVIDUALS AND BUSINESSES.(5) IN ADDITION TO HIS PROFESSIONAL ACHIEVEMENTS, MR. LARSON GENEROUSLY GAVE HIS TIME AND KNOWLEDGE TO MENTOR YOUNG ENGINEERS, SUPPORT COMMUNITY INITIATIVES AND ADVOCATE FOR SUSTAINABLE AND FORWARD-THINKING INFRASTRUCTURE SOLUTIONS.(6) AFTER GRADUATING FROM HIGH SCHOOL IN 1952, MR. LARSON SERVED 14 YEARS IN THE NAVY RESERVE AND RECEIVED AN HONORABLE DISCHARGE.(7) IN 1956, MR. LARSON GRADUATED FROM BUCKNELL UNIVERSITY AND LATER WORKED IN THE FORMER DEPARTMENT OF FORESTS AND WATERS, THE FORMER DEPARTMENT OF HIGHWAYS AND PENNDOT.20250SB0078PN1011 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) THROUGH HIS WORK AT PENNDOT, MR. LARSON WAS APPOINTED TO SUPERVISE CONSTRUCTION AND MAINTENANCE PROJECTS IN MULTIPLE COUNTIES AND IN 1966 BECAME THE YOUNGEST APPOINTED DISTRICT ENGINEER.(9) AMONG MR. LARSON'S CAREER ACCOMPLISHMENTS WERE ASSISTING IN THE COMPLETION OF PORTIONS OF U.S. ROUTE 15 AND INTERSTATE 80, SERVING AS LIAISON WITH THE THORNBURGH ADMINISTRATION, ASSISTING IN THE IMPLEMENTATION OF COMPUTER-AIDED DRAFTING AND DESIGN IN PENNSYLVANIA, INSPECTING DELINQUENT BRIDGES AND ASSISTING IN ROAD IMPROVEMENTS.(10) AS THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER OF THE LARSON DESIGN GROUP, MR. LARSON'S VISION WAS TO CREATE CAREERS SO THAT TALENTED ENGINEERS, ARCHITECTS AND SURVEYORS WOULD REMAIN IN LYCOMING COUNTY.(11) MR. LARSON PASSED AWAY DECEMBER 22, 2024.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE PORTION OF INTERSTATE 180 FROM THE LYCOMING-NORTHUMBERLAND COUNTY LINE TO THE INTERCHANGE WITH EXISTING U.S. ROUTE 15 AND U.S. ROUTE 220 IN LYCOMING COUNTY IS DESIGNATED AS THE KENNETH C. LARSON, JR., MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 24. THE BAKER BROTHERS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE BAKER BROTHERS WERE SEVEN MEMBERS OF THE SAME FAMILY WHO SERVED A COMBINED 125 YEARS.(2) FRANCIS J. BAKER SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES AIR FORCE FROM 1956 TO 1979.(3) EDWARD R. BAKER SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES AIR 20250SB0078PN1011 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FORCE FROM 1957 TO 1961.(4) THOMAS G. BAKER SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES AIR FORCE FROM 1962 TO 1992.(5) RAYMOND J. BAKER SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES AIR FORCE FROM 1966 TO 1988.(6) PHILIP J. BAKER SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES AIR FORCE FROM 1966 TO 1986.(7) CHARLES A. BAKER SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY FROM 1967 TO 1968.(8) JOSEPH M. BAKER SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES NAVY FROM 1971 TO 1995.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 5664, ON THAT PORTION OF OLD PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 220 NORTH OVER THE BEAVERDAM BRANCH OF THE JUNIATA RIVER IN ALLEGHENY TOWNSHIP, BLAIR COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE BAKER BROTHERS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 25. SERGEANT ROBERT E. DAVIS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) SERGEANT ROBERT E. DAVIS SERVED AS A SERGEANT AND TOP TURRET GUNNER ON B-17G "BETTY LOU" #42-37962, 532ND BOMBER SQUADRON, 381ST BOMBER GROUP, HEAVY, UNITED STATES ARMY AIR FORCE DURING WORLD WAR II.(2) SERGEANT DAVIS WAS KILLED IN ACTION ON JANUARY 11, 1944, WHEN THE BOMBER HE WAS IN SUSTAINED DAMAGE AND CRASHED IN GERMANY.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 20250SB0078PN1011 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 44229, ON THAT PORTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 22, 3RD AVENUE, OVER BLAIR GAP RUN IN DUNCANSVILLE BOROUGH, BLAIR COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE SERGEANT ROBERT E. DAVIS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 26. ARTHUR R. WALTER, JR., MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) ARTHUR R. WALTER, JR., WAS EMPLOYED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, DISTRICT 9-2, AT HOLLIDAYSBURG FOR 15 YEARS AND WAS A THIRD-PARTY COMMERCIAL DRIVER'S LICENSE EXAMINER.(2) MR. WALTER SPENT MORE THAN TWO DECADES SUPPORTING HIS COMMUNITY BY BEING A REFEREE AND UMPIRE FOR HIGH SCHOOL ATHLETES IN BLAIR AND BEDFORD COUNTIES.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 5784, ON THAT PORTION OF STATE ROUTE 3013, DUNNINGS HIGHWAY, OVER BEAVERDAM CREEK IN GREENFIELD TOWNSHIP, BLAIR COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE ARTHUR R. WALTER, JR., MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 27. LIEUTENANT COLONEL DANIEL LEE SWAYNE MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) LIEUTENANT COLONEL DANIEL LEE SWAYNE WAS COMMISSIONED AS AN OFFICER IN THE UNITED STATES AIR FORCE IN 1987 AND BECAME AN F-16 PILOT IN 1988.20250SB0078PN1011 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) AFTER 21 YEARS IN THE MILITARY, LIEUTENANT COLONEL SWAYNE RETIRED AND CONTINUED TO TRAIN OTHER PILOTS AS AN INSTRUCTOR.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 47600, ON THAT PORTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 220, EAST PLEASANT VALLEY BOULEVARD, OVER LITTLE JUNIATA RIVER IN ANTIS TOWNSHIP, BLAIR COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE LIEUTENANT COLONEL DANIEL LEE SWAYNE MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 28. PRIVATE FIRST CLASS JAMES A. BEHE MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) AFTER GRADUATING FROM ALTOONA CATHOLIC HIGH SCHOOL IN 1942, PRIVATE FIRST CLASS JAMES A. BEHE JOINED THE UNITED STATES ARMY THE FOLLOWING YEAR.(2) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS BEHE SERVED HIS COUNTRY DURING WORLD WAR II.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 68408, ON THAT PORTION OF WOPSONONOCK AVENUE OVER SPRING RUN IN THE CITY OF ALTOONA, BLAIR COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE PRIVATE FIRST CLASS JAMES A. BEHE MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 29. SERGEANT PATRICK C. HAWKINS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) SERGEANT PATRICK C. HAWKINS WAS BORN OCTOBER 1, 20250SB0078PN1011 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1988, IN COLUMBUS, GEORGIA.(2) AS A "MILITARY BRAT," SGT. HAWKINS WAS RAISED IN VARIOUS TOWNS, INCLUDING BERLIN, GERMANY; FT. LEAVENWORTH/LANSING, KS; FT. CAMPBELL, KY; STUTTGART, GE; AND FINALLY, CARLISLE, PA.(3) SGT. HAWKINS GRADUATED FROM CARLISLE HIGH SCHOOL IN 2007.(4) SGT. HAWKINS ATTENDED HARRISBURG AREA COMMUNITY COLLEGE TO STUDY CULINARY ARTS FOLLOWING HIS HIGH SCHOOL GRADUATION.(5) SGT. HAWKINS WORKED MULTIPLE JOBS IN THE DINING INDUSTRY BEFORE ENLISTING IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY IN 2010.(6) SGT. HAWKINS SOUGHT OUT SERVICE IN THE MILITARY LIKE HIS FATHER HAD YEARS BEFORE.(7) SGT. HAWKINS EXCELLED IN HIS TRAINING, EVENTUALLY BEING ASSIGNED TO COMPANY B, 3RD BATTALION, 75TH RANGER REGIMENT, AS AN ARMY RANGER AT FORT BENNING, GEORGIA.(8) ON OCTOBER 6, 2013, SGT. HAWKINS WAS KILLED IN ACTION WHILE GOING TO THE AID OF A WOUNDED COMRADE IN KANDAHAR PROVINCE, AFGHANISTAN.(9) FOR HIS BRAVERY, SGT. HAWKINS WAS POSTHUMOUSLY AWARDED THE BRONZE STAR MEDAL, THE MERITORIOUS SERVICE MEDAL AND THE PURPLE HEART.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 45589, LOCATED ON THAT PORTION OF SPRING ROAD OVER THE CONODOGUINET CREEK IN NORTH MIDDLETON TOWNSHIP, CUMBERLAND COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE SERGEANT PATRICK C. HAWKINS MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO 20250SB0078PN1011 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 30. STAFF SERGEANT NORMAN W. REIFSNYDER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:(1) NORMAN W. REIFSNYDER WAS RAISED IN NORTH HEIDELBERG TOWNSHIP, BERKS COUNTY, AND GRADUATED FROM PENN BERNVILLE HIGH SCHOOL IN 1939.(2) STAFF SERGEANT REIFSNYDER SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES ARMY DURING WORLD WAR II IN THE 80TH DIVISION AS A STAFF SERGEANT IN RADIO COMMUNICATIONS AND SERVED IN FRANCE, LUXEMBOURG AND RHINELAND, GERMANY AND AT THE BATTLE OF THE BULGE.(3) STAFF SERGEANT REIFSNYDER WAS AWARDED THE BRONZE STAR AND SOLDIERS MEDAL FOR HIS HONORABLE SERVICE.(4) STAFF SERGEANT REIFSNYDER AND HIS FAMILY WERE DAIRY FARMERS FOR 21 YEARS AND, IN 1962, WERE SELECTED AS THE READING FAIR OUTSTANDING FARM FAMILY.(5) STAFF SERGEANT REIFSNYDER WAS A LIFELONG MEMBER OF NORTH HEIDELBERG CHURCH, AN ACTIVE VOLUNTEER FOR PENN STATE BERKS COUNTY MASTER GARDNER PROGRAM AND A PARTICIPANT IN THE BERNVILLE CHRISTMAS BIRD COUNTY FOR OVER 30 YEARS.(6) AFTER A LIFE DEDICATED TO THE SERVICE OF OTHERS, STAFF SERGEANT REIFSNYDER PASSED AWAY FEBRUARY 24, 2025, AT 103 YEARS OF AGE.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE PORTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 183, ALSO KNOWN AS BERNVILLE ROAD, FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH MT. PLEASANT ROAD IN PENN TOWNSHIP, BERKS COUNTY, SOUTHBOUND TO THE BRIDGE OVER LICKING CREEK IN PENN TOWNSHIP WITH IDENTIFICATION NUMBER 0601830180000 IS DESIGNATED AS THE STAFF SERGEANT NORMAN W. REIFSNYDER MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.20250SB0078PN1011 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 31. CORPORAL JOHN F. MUFFLER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) JOHN FREDERICK MUFFLER WAS BORN DECEMBER 13, 1963, IN ELKINS PARK, MONTGOMERY COUNTY.(2) CORPORAL MUFFLER GRADUATED FROM NESHAMINY HIGH SCHOOL IN 1981 AND WAS A DEDICATED DRUMMER IN THE NESHAMINY MARCHING BAND.(3) CORPORAL MUFFLER SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS AS A LANCE CORPORAL.(4) CORPORAL MUFFLER WAS KILLED IN THE TERRORIST BOMBING OF THE UNITED STATES MARINE BARRACKS.(5) IN THE EARLY MORNING HOURS OF OCTOBER 23, 1983, A TRUCK LOADED WITH EXPLOSIVES CRASHED THROUGH THE SECURITY PERIMETER OF THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS BARRACKS IN BEIRUT, LEBANON.(6) IN THE EXPLOSION THAT FOLLOWED, 241 UNITED STATES MILITARY PERSONNEL WERE KILLED AND 80 SERIOUSLY WOUNDED.(7) CORPORAL MUFFLER'S MOTHER SUPPORTED THE MEMORY OF HIS SERVICE AND SACRIFICE TO OUR COUNTRY BY PROMOTING THE ESTABLISHMENT OF THE BEIRUT MEMORIAL IN PHILADELPHIA.(8) AN ANNUAL AWARD, INSPIRED BY JOHN F. MUFFLER, IS PRESENTED TO A DRUMMER IN THE NESHAMINY BAND.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 7027, CARRYING PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 413 OVER U.S. ROUTE 1 IN MIDDLETOWN TOWNSHIP, BUCKS COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE CORPORAL JOHN F. MUFFLER MEMORIAL BRIDGE.20250SB0078PN1011 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 32. PFC WILLIAM P. O'FARRELL MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) WILLIAM P. O'FARRELL WAS BORN OCTOBER 9, 1948, IN JOHNSTOWN, CAMBRIA COUNTY.(2) PFC O'FARRELL WAS RAISED IN NANTY GLO, CAMBRIA COUNTY, AND ATTENDED NANTY GLO-VINTONDALE HIGH SCHOOL.(3) IN GRADE SCHOOL, PFC O'FARRELL ATTENDED SAINT MARY'S PARISH IN NANTY GLO. (4) PFC O'FARRELL ALSO PLAYED LITTLE LEAGUE BASEBALL AND LATER PLAYED FOOTBALL IN HIGH SCHOOL.(5) PFC O'FARRELL HAD ALWAYS WANTED TO BECOME A MARINE AND, FOLLOWING HIS GRADUATION FROM HIGH SCHOOL, HE ENLISTED IN THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS.(6) WILLIAM P. O'FARRELL HELD THE RANK OF PRIVATE FIRST CLASS.(7) PFC O'FARRELL WAS ASSIGNED TO A COMPANY, 1ST BATTALION, 3RD MARINES, 3RD MARINE DIVISION.(8) PFC O'FARRELL SERVED DURING THE VIETNAM WAR AND ARRIVED IN VIETNAM ON MARCH 16, 1968.(9) ON APRIL 17, 1968, ONE MONTH AFTER HIS TOUR BEGAN, PFC O'FARRELL WAS KILLED IN ACTION BY HOSTILE FIRE IN QUẢNG TRỊ PROVINCE, SOUTH VIETNAM.(10) PFC O'FARRELL IS BURIED AT SAINT MARY'S CEMETERY IN NANTY GLO.(11) PFC O' FARRELL'S NAME IS INSCRIBED ON PANEL 50E, LINE 32 OF THE VIETNAM VETERANS MEMORIAL IN WASHINGTON, DC.20250SB0078PN1011 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 8510, CARRYING PA ROUTE 271 OVER PERGRIN RUN IN THE BOROUGH OF NANTY GLO, CAMBRIA COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE PFC WILLIAM P. O'FARRELL MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 33. SEAMAN FIRST CLASS JOHN M. MCGINTY MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) JOHN M. MCGINTY WAS BORN MARCH 25, 1915, IN SAINT MICHAEL, CAMBRIA COUNTY.(2) SEAMAN FIRST CLASS MCGINTY ATTENDED ADAMS SUMMERHILL HIGH SCHOOL.(3) SEAMAN FIRST CLASS MCGINTY WAS DRAFTED DURING WORLD WAR II AND SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES NAVY.(4) BEFORE HIS DEPLOYMENT, SEAMAN FIRST CLASS MCGINTY MARRIED ELLEN RITA SEESE OF SAINT MICHAEL.(5) DURING THE WAR, SEAMAN FIRST CLASS MCGINTY WAS ASSIGNED TO THE USS INDIANAPOLIS.(6) ON JULY 30, 1945, THE USS INDIANAPOLIS WAS HIT BY JAPANESE SUBMARINE TORPEDOES OFF THE COAST OF THE CAROLINE ISLANDS IN THE PHILIPPINE SEA AND SANK AFTER 12 MINUTES.(7) FOLLOWING THE ATTACK, SEAMAN FIRST CLASS MCGINTY WAS DECLARED LOST AT SEA.(8) SEAMAN FIRST CLASS JOHN M. MCGINTY IS MEMORIALIZED ON THE WALLS OF THE MISSING AT THE MANILA AMERICAN CEMETERY IN THE PHILIPPINES.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 8457, CARRYING U.S. ROUTE 219 OVER PA ROUTE 869 IN ADAMS TOWNSHIP, 20250SB0078PN1011 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CAMBRIA COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE SEAMAN FIRST CLASS JOHN M. MCGINTY MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 34. CHIEF JOSEPH J. MONTGOMERY, JR. MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) JOSEPH J. MONTGOMERY, JR., WAS RAISED IN GRADYVILLE, AND GRADUATED FROM PENNCREST HIGH SCHOOL IN 1987.(2) AS A YOUNG MAN, MR. MONTGOMERY DISCOVERED THE IMPORTANCE OF BEING AN ACTIVE PARTICIPANT IN ONE'S COMMUNITY AS A BOY SCOUT OF AMERICA WHERE HE EARNED MEMBERSHIP TO THE ORDER OF THE ARROW, AN HONOR RESERVED FOR THOSE THAT MOST EXEMPLIFY THE VALUE OF THE BOY SCOUTS.(3) MR. MONTGOMERY COMMITTED HIMSELF TO THE SERVICE OF HIS COMMUNITY AS A LIFETIME MEMBER OF THE EDGMONT AND ROCKY RUN FIRE COMPANIES, AS PART OF THE DELAWARE COUNTY PARK POLICE AND AS A PARAMEDIC FOR MAIN LINE HEALTH EMS FOR 30 YEARS.(4) MR. MONTGOMERY ALSO OWNED AND OPERATED HIS OWN BUSINESS, PRO RESCUE, WHICH ALLOWED HIM TO USE HIS KNOWLEDGE AND LIFESAVING SKILLS TO EDUCATE AND TRAIN OTHERS IN THE COMMUNITY IN CPR AND FIRST AID READINESS.(5) MR. MONTGOMERY WAS ALSO A MEMBER OF THE CONCORD MASONIC LODGE #625.(6) AFTER A LIFE DEDICATED TO THE SERVICE OF OTHERS, MR. MONTGOMERY SADLY PASSED AWAY ON SEPTEMBER 29, 2023, AT 54 YEARS OF AGE.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE SECTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 352, 20250SB0078PN1011 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ALSO KNOWN AS MIDDLETOWN ROAD, FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH STATE ROUTE 4008, ALSO KNOWN AS GRADYVILLE ROAD, IN EDGMONT TOWNSHIP, DELAWARE COUNTY, TO THE INTERSECTION WITH PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 452, ALSO KNOWN AS NORTH PENNELL ROAD, IN MIDDLETOWN TOWNSHIP, DELAWARE COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED THE CHIEF JOSEPH J. MONTGOMERY, JR. MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 35. JUDGE R. BARRY MCANDREWS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) JUDGE R. BARRY MCANDREWS WAS BORN IN PHILADELPHIA AND GREW UP IN THE WEST OAK LANE NEIGHBORHOOD WHERE HE GRADUATED FROM LASALLE COLLEGE HIGH SCHOOL IN 1950.(2) AFTER GRADUATING FROM LASALLE UNIVERSITY IN 1954, JUDGE MCANDREWS RECEIVED HIS JURIS DOCTOR DEGREE FROM VILLANOVA UNIVERSITY SCHOOL OF LAW IN 1957.(3) FOLLOWING HIS GRADUATION FROM LAW SCHOOL, JUDGE MCANDREWS SERVED IN THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORP FROM 1957 TO 1962, RECEIVING THE RANK OF CAPTAIN WHILE STATIONED IN HAWAII WITH HIS WIFE, LIZ, AND CHILDREN.(4) JUDGE MCANDREWS HELD MANY ROLES THROUGHOUT HIS LEGAL CAREER, INCLUDING CHIEF COUNSEL AT CERTAINTEED CORPORATION FROM 1962 TO 1967 AND AN ASSISTANT PUBLIC DEFENDER FROM 1968 TO 1969.(5) JUDGE MCANDREWS WAS A PARTNER IN PRIVATE PRACTICE FROM 1967 TO 1991 WHICH LED TO HIS APPOINTMENT AS A JUDGE FOR THE COURT OF COMMON PLEAS OF BUCKS COUNTY IN MAY 1991 BY GOVERNOR BOB CASEY, THEN HE WAS ELECTED FOR A 10-YEAR TERM AS 20250SB0078PN1011 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE ELEVENTH JUDGE ON THE BENCH.(6) WHILE SERVING ON THE BENCH, JUDGE MCANDREWS WAS SELECTED AS PRESIDENT JUDGE IN 1999, A ROLE HE HELD UNTIL HIS RETIREMENT IN 2003.(7) AS PRESIDENT JUDGE, JUDGE MCANDREWS WAS A LEADING ADVOCATE FOR THE BUILDING OF THE NEW BUCKS COUNTY JUSTICE CENTER WHICH OPENED IN JANUARY 2015.(8) AFTER MANY YEARS OF SERVICE TO THIS COMMONWEALTH AND TO OUR COUNTRY, JUDGE R. BARRY MCANDREWS PASSED AWAY ON MARCH 23, 2024, AT 91 YEARS OF AGE.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE SECTION OF STATE ROUTE 1006, ALSO KNOWN AS FERRY ROAD, FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH LIMEKILN ROAD TO THE INTERSECTION WITH PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 313, ALSO KNOWN AS SWAMP ROAD, IN DOYLESTOWN TOWNSHIP, BUCKS COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED THE JUDGE R. BARRY MCANDREWS MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 36. PFC HELMUT BOEHM MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS HELMUT BOEHM WAS BORN APRIL 6, 1925, IN THE VILLAGE OF HEROLD IN THE ERZGEBIRGE REGION OF SAXONY, GERMANY, TO OSKAR AND ANNA BOEHM.(2) AT THE AGE OF THREE, PFC BOEHM CAME TO THE UNITED STATES WITH HIS PARENTS AND SIBLINGS AND SETTLED IN THE WORKING CLASS NEIGHBORHOOD OF OLNEY IN THE CITY OF PHILADELPHIA.(3) AFTER GRADUATING FROM OLNEY HIGH SCHOOL IN 1943, PFC BOEHM WAS DRAFTED INTO THE UNITED STATES ARMY AND SERVED AS 20250SB0078PN1011 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AN AMBULANCE ORDERLY (PRIVATE FIRST CLASS) IN THE 479TH MOTOR AMBULANCE COMPANY DURING WORLD WAR II.(4) DEPLOYED LESS THAN ONE MONTH AFTER D-DAY IN 1944, PFC BOEHM COMMENCED HIS SERVICE DURING THE HEAVY OPERATION OVERLORD COMBAT THROUGH THE HEDGEROWS OF NORMANDY, FRANCE.(5) DRIVING AN AMBULANCE INTO COMBAT AREAS, PFC BOEHM CONTINUALLY TRANSPORTED THE WOUNDED FROM THE BATTLEFIELD TO EVACUATION AIRSTRIPS AND FIELD HOSPITALS WHILE PROVIDING EMERGENCY TREATMENTS, ADMINISTERING NECESSARY INJECTIONS, BLOOD PLASMA AND MEDICATIONS AND APPLYING BANDAGES UNTIL THE WOUNDED WERE SUCCESSFULLY EVACUATED TO SAFETY.(6) PFC BOEHM CONTINUED THESE MISSION-CRITICAL DUTIES UNTIL LIBERATING THE BUCHENWALD CONCENTRATION CAMP NEAR THE END OF WORLD WAR II.(7) PFC BOEHM SAW ACTION IN NORTHERN FRANCE, BELGIUM AND THE ARDENNES (BATTLE OF THE BULGE), THE RHINELAND (REMAGEN BRIDGE) AND GERMANY.(8) PFC BOEHM WAS AWARDED THE BRONZE STAR FOR HIS VOLUNTARY PARTICIPATION IN A NIGHT MISSION TO EVACUATE THE WOUNDED TRAPPED BEHIND ENEMY LINES DURING THE BATTLE OF THE HÜRTGEN FOREST IN NOVEMBER 1944.(9) AFTER THE CESSATION OF HOSTILITIES, PFC BOEHM WAS TASKED WITH THE EVACUATION OF MANY REFUGEES FLEEING THE SOVIET ARMY IN EASTERN EUROPE.(10) AFTER RETURNING FROM EUROPE AND THE WAR, PFC BOEHM WORKED AS AN INDUSTRIAL PAINTER AND UNDERTOOK AN APPRENTICESHIP ALONG WITH VOCATIONAL ELECTRICIAN TRAINING.(11) PFC BOEHM WAS MARRIED TO HIS WIFE, ELFRIEDE EDITH SCHWARZKOPF, FOR 66 YEARS AND HAD ONE SON, GERALD, ONE DAUGHTER, CHERYL, SIX GRANDCHILDREN AND ONE GREAT-GRANDSON.20250SB0078PN1011 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (12) PRIVATE FIRST CLASS HELMUT BOEHM PASSED AWAY JUNE 10, 2024, AT 99 YEARS OF AGE.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE ENTIRE PORTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 232 WITHIN THE BOROUGH OF ROCKLEDGE, MONTGOMERY COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE PFC HELMUT BOEHM MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 37. HON. RAYMOND T. BOOK MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) BORN IN PITTSBURGH ON FEBRUARY 14, 1925, MR. BOOK WAS THE SON OF THE LATE RAYMOND AND MARGARET BOOK.(2) DURING WORLD WAR II, MR. BOOK SERVED HIS COUNTRY WITH HONOR AND WAS AWARDED NUMEROUS MEDALS.(3) AFTER HIS HONORABLE DISCHARGE, HE ATTENDED ROBERT MORRIS BUSINESS COLLEGE AND THE UNIVERSITY OF PITTSBURGH BEFORE BEGINNING HIS CAREER WITH J&L STEEL IN 1948.(4) HE ALSO WORKED IN THE REAL ESTATE INDUSTRY FOR MORE THAN FOUR DECADES.(5) MR. BOOK TURNED HIS ATTENTION TO POLITICS IN 1980 WHEN HE WAS ELECTED TO SERVE ON THE WHITEHALL BOROUGH COUNCIL.(6) IN 1982, HE BECAME REPRESENTATIVE BOOK UPON HIS ELECTION TO THE PENNSYLVANIA HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.(7) DURING HIS TENURE AS A LEGISLATOR, HE WAS A SPONSOR OF THE ORGAN DONOR BILL.(8) AFTER SERVING THREE CONSECUTIVE TERMS IN THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, HE TURNED HIS ATTENTION TO THE REAL ESTATE INDUSTRY AND SERVED AS THE DIRECTOR OF THE REAL ESTATE 20250SB0078PN1011 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 APPEALS DEPARTMENT BEFORE SERVING ON THE PENNSYLVANIA REAL ESTATE BOARD FOR EIGHT YEARS.(9) AFTER HIS RETIREMENT, HE CONTINUED TO SERVE HIS COMMUNITY BY VOLUNTEERING WITH JEFFERSON HOSPITAL.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE PORTION OF PENNSYLVANIA ROUTE 51 FROM SEGMENT 0280/OFFSET 0000 TO SEGMENT 0300/OFFSET 0570 IN WHITEHALL BOROUGH, ALLEGHENY COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE HON. RAYMOND T. BOOK MEMORIAL HIGHWAY.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE HIGHWAY TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE HIGHWAY.SECTION 38. HONORABLE JAMES F. PRENDERGAST MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE HONORABLE JAMES F. PRENDERGAST WAS BORN FEBRUARY 5, 1917, IN EASTON, NORTHAMPTON COUNTY.(2) MR. PRENDERGAST GRADUATED FROM EASTON HIGH SCHOOL IN 1934 AND RECEIVED A BACHELOR OF ARTS DEGREE FROM LAFAYETTE COLLEGE IN 1938.(3) MR. PRENDERGAST SERVED AS A SECOND LIEUTENANT IN THE UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS DURING WORLD WAR II.(4) MR. PRENDERGAST WAS AWARDED THE NAVY CROSS FOR HIS VALOR DURING THE BATTLE OF SAIPAN IN THE SOUTH PACIFIC AND WAS A DOUBLE PURPLE HEART RECIPIENT.(5) FOLLOWING THE WAR, MR. PRENDERGAST RECEIVED A BACHELOR OF LAWS DEGREE FROM GEORGE WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY LAW SCHOOL IN 1951, WAS ADMITTED TO THE BAR IN WASHINGTON, DC, IN 1952, AND OPENED HIS LAW PRACTICE IN EASTON IN 1953.(6) MR. PRENDERGAST WAS ELECTED TO REPRESENT THE 136TH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT IN THE PENNSYLVANIA HOUSE OF 20250SB0078PN1011 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REPRESENTATIVES IN 1958 AND WAS REELECTED FOR NINE CONSECUTIVE TERMS THEREAFTER, SERVING A TOTAL OF 20 YEARS AS A STATE REPRESENTATIVE.(7) DURING HIS TENURE IN THE PENNSYLVANIA HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, MR. PRENDERGAST'S PEERS ELECTED HIM TO SERVE AS THE MAJORITY CAUCUS SECRETARY FROM 1965 TO 1966, THE MINORITY CAUCUS CHAIRMAN FROM 1967 TO 1968 AND 1973 TO 1974, THE MAJORITY WHIP FROM 1968 TO 1972 AND THE MAJORITY CAUCUS ADMINISTRATOR FROM 1975 TO 1978.(8) MR. PRENDERGAST ALSO SERVED APPOINTMENTS TO THE LEGISLATIVE BUDGET AND FINANCE COMMITTEE FROM 1963 TO 1964 AND THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION FROM 1967 TO 1974 AND SERVED AS A DELEGATE TO PENNSYLVANIA'S CONSTITUTIONAL CONVENTION IN 1968.(9) MR. PRENDERGAST PASSED AWAY APRIL 29, 1985, IN EASTON, NORTHAMPTON COUNTY.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 28737, CARRYING 13TH STREET OVER BUSHKILL CREEK IN THE CITY OF EASTON, NORTHAMPTON COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED THE HONORABLE JAMES F. PRENDERGAST MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 39. BLUE STAR FAMILY TRIBUTE ROUNDABOUT.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE BLUE STAR FAMILY DESIGNATION HONORS FAMILIES WITH A MEMBER CURRENTLY SERVING IN THE UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES, SYMBOLIZING THEIR SACRIFICE AND COMMITMENT TO THE NATION.20250SB0078PN1011 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) BUCKS COUNTY HAS A STRONG TRADITION OF MILITARY SERVICE, WITH MANY RESIDENTS ACTIVELY SERVING IN THE UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES, EARNING THEIR FAMILIES THE BLUE STAR DESIGNATION.(3) DESIGNATING A ROUNDABOUT IN DOYLESTOWN TOWNSHIP AS THE BLUE STAR FAMILY TRIBUTE ROUNDABOUT RECOGNIZES THE ONGOING CONTRIBUTIONS AND SACRIFICES OF THESE FAMILIES WITHIN THE COMMUNITY.(4) THIS DESIGNATION SERVES AS A LASTING TRIBUTE TO INSPIRE COMMUNITY GRATITUDE AND SUPPORT FOR MILITARY FAMILIES.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE WESTERN ROUNDABOUT ON STATE ROUTE 1001 AT THE INTERSECTION OF NEW BRITAIN ROAD AND SOUTH EASTON ROAD IN DOYLESTOWN TOWNSHIP, BUCKS COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED THE BLUE STAR FAMILY TRIBUTE ROUNDABOUT.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE ROUNDABOUT ON THE MAJOR APPROACHES TO THE ROUNDABOUT.SECTION 40. GOLD STAR FAMILY TRIBUTE ROUNDABOUT.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE GOLD STAR FAMILY DESIGNATION RECOGNIZES FAMILIES WHO HAVE LOST A LOVED ONE IN MILITARY SERVICE, REPRESENTING THE ULTIMATE SACRIFICE MADE FOR THE FREEDOMS ENJOYED BY ALL AMERICANS.(2) BUCKS COUNTY IS HOME TO FAMILIES WHO HAVE ENDURED THE PROFOUND LOSS OF A SERVICE MEMBER, EARNING THE GOLD STAR DESIGNATION.(3) DESIGNATING A ROUNDABOUT IN DOYLESTOWN TOWNSHIP AS THE GOLD STAR FAMILY TRIBUTE ROUNDABOUT HONORS THE MEMORY OF 20250SB0078PN1011 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FALLEN SERVICE MEMBERS AND THE ENDURING STRENGTH OF THEIR FAMILIES.(4) THIS DESIGNATION PROVIDES A PERMANENT MEMORIAL TO FOSTER COMMUNITY REFLECTION ON THE SACRIFICES OF GOLD STAR FAMILIES.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE EASTERN ROUNDABOUT ON STATE ROUTE 1001 AT THE INTERSECTION OF NEW BRITAIN ROAD AND SAUERMAN ROAD IN DOYLESTOWN TOWNSHIP, BUCKS COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED THE GOLD STAR FAMILY TRIBUTE ROUNDABOUT.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE ROUNDABOUT ON THE MAJOR APPROACHES TO THE ROUNDABOUT.SECTION 41. GEORGE W. MCAULEY, JR. MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) GEORGE W. MCAULEY, JR., WAS BORN DECEMBER 19, 1962, TO GEORGE W. MCAULEY, SR., AND LULU (NÉE HARTMAN) MCAULEY.(2) MR. MCAULEY GRADUATED FROM KITTANNING HIGH SCHOOL AND LENAPE TECHNICAL SCHOOL IN 1980, BEFORE EARNING A DEGREE IN CIVIL ENGINEERING FROM THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE UNIVERSITY IN 1984.(3) FOR 33 YEARS, MR. MCAULEY HAD A DISTINGUISHED CAREER WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION. DURING THAT TIME, HE SERVED AS A PROFESSIONAL ENGINEER AND AS AN ASSISTANT DISTRICT EXECUTIVE OVERSEEING VARIOUS OPERATIONS IN THE DEPARTMENT'S DISTRICT 10. ADDITIONALLY, HE BRIEFLY SERVED AS THE ACTING DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION'S BUREAU OF PROJECT DELIVERY.(4) IN DECEMBER 2016, MR. MCAULEY BECAME THE DEPARTMENT'S DEPUTY SECRETARY FOR HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION AND 20250SB0078PN1011 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WAS APPOINTED THE EXECUTIVE DEPUTY SECRETARY OF TRANSPORTATION ON JANUARY 7, 2020.(5) MR. MCAULEY PLAYED AN INSTRUMENTAL ROLE IN THE ADVANCEMENT OF PENNSYLVANIA'S RAPID BRIDGE REPLACEMENT PUBLIC PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP CONTRACT TO DELIVER 558 BRIDGES STATEWIDE, THE FIRST OF ITS SCOPE IN THE UNITED STATES.(6) IN ADDITION TO HIS WORK AT THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, MR. MCAULEY WAS AN ACTIVE MEMBER OF THE AMERICAN ASSOCIATION OF STATE HIGHWAY AND TRANSPORTATION OFFICIALS AND SERVED AS CHAIR OF ITS INNOVATION INITIATIVE AS WELL AS CHAIR OF THE NATIONAL COOPERATIVE HIGHWAY RESEARCH PROGRAM.(7) ON FEBRUARY 28, 2021, GEORGE MCAULEY PASSED AWAY AT 58 YEARS OF AGE, LEAVING BEHIND HIS LOVING WIFE OF 35 YEARS, STEPHANIE (NÉE WILLYARD) MCAULEY, AND THEIR DAUGHTER MEGAN.(8) TO COMMEMORATE MR. MCAULEY'S EXCEPTIONAL SERVICE AND LEADERSHIP, THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION ESTABLISHED THE GEORGE W. MCAULEY, JR., P.E. AWARD FOR INNOVATION. THE AWARD RECOGNIZES EMPLOYEE-DRIVEN TEAMS OF THREE OR MORE THAT HELP TO PROMOTE AND FOSTER CONTINUOUS IMPROVEMENT AT THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION BY ADVANCING AN INNOVATION OR SOLVING A PROBLEM.(9) MR. MCAULEY'S DISTINGUISHED SERVICE AT THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION HAS IMPROVED HIGHWAY SAFETY IN THIS COMMONWEALTH AND IS DESERVING OF RECOGNITION.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 56035, CARRYING U.S. ROUTE 422 OVER STATE ROUTE 2005 AND CHERRY RUN IN PLUMCREEK TOWNSHIP, ARMSTRONG COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED THE GEORGE W. MCAULEY, JR. MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND 20250SB0078PN1011 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 42. E. PEARL SMITH MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) E. PEARL SMITH WAS BORN NOVEMBER 23, 1938, IN NORRISTOWN, PENNSYLVANIA.(2) E. PEARL SMITH WAS VERY ACTIVE IN CHURCH AND JOINED MT. ZION A.M.E. IN 1951 WHEN SHE WAS 13 YEARS OLD.(3) E. PEARL SMITH SERVED ON THE STEWARD BOARD FOR 45 YEARS AND ALSO HELD THE TITLE OF STEWARD BOARD SECRETARY FOR 28 YEARS.(4) E. PEARL SMITH SERVED ON MANY CHURCH COMMITTEES, INCLUDING SECRETARY OF THE STEWARDSHIP AND FINANCE COMMITTEE FOR 28 YEARS AND PRESIDENT AND SECRETARY OF THE COOPERATIVE CLUB FOR TWO TERMS. SHE ORGANIZED THE YOUTH NEW MEMBERS CLASS, CHAIRED AND CO-CHAIRED SEVERAL WOMEN'S DAY CELEBRATIONS AND SERVED WITH THE COAT AND SOUP MINISTRY AND THE DINNER AND CONCERT EVENT. SHE ALSO SERVED AS QUARTERLY CONFERENCE SECRETARY, AS CLASS LEADER AND ON THE SCHOLARSHIP COMMITTEE AND THE LAY ORGANIZATION.(5) E. PEARL SMITH SERVED AS A MEMBER OF THE BUSINESS AND PROFESSIONAL WOMEN'S, INC., AND RECEIVED THE WOMAN OF THE YEAR AWARD IN 1998-1999.(6) HER ACCOLADES INCLUDED THE ELWOOD LODGE #438 COMMUNITY SERVICE AWARD IN 2011, THE GEORGE W. COMMANDERY AWARD IN 2003, THE NORRISTOWN EDUCATIONAL FOUNDATION SERVICE AWARD AND THE DISTINGUISHED RECOGNITION FROM THE PENNSYLVANIA SCHOOL EDUCATION ASSOCIATION.(7) E. PEARL SMITH WAS ELECTED AS A DIRECTOR OF THE 20250SB0078PN1011 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NORRISTOWN AREA SCHOOL DISTRICT (NASD) SCHOOL BOARD, WHICH SHE HELD UNTIL SHE RETIRED IN 2016.(8) DURING HER TENURE ON THE SCHOOL BOARD, E. PEARL SMITH SERVED AS THE CHAIR OF THE EDUCATION FOUNDATION'S TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE AND WAS A BOARD REPRESENTATIVE OF THE NASD FOUNDATION AND CO-CHAIR OF THE BUDGET COMMITTEE.(9) E. PEARL SMITH HELD MANY MORE TITLES, INCLUDING JOINT OPERATING COMMITTEE CHAIR FOR THE CENTRAL MONTGOMERY COUNTY TECHNICAL HIGH SCHOOL, ASSISTANT REGION 11 DIRECTOR AND LIAISON FOR THE PENNSYLVANIA SCHOOL BOARD ASSOCIATION ON THE GOVERNANCE AND BY-LAW COMMITTEES, AND SHE HELD THE SAME TITLE FOR THE NORRISTOWN SCHOOL BOARD AS WELL AS SERVING AS THE MINORITY REPRESENTATIVE.(10) ADDITIONALLY, E. PEARL SMITH WAS ALSO A VOLUNTEER FOR THE AMERICAN CANCER SOCIETY'S ROAD TO RECOVERY AND A LIFETIME MEMBER OF THE PHILADELPHIA PURCHASING ASSOCIATION'S AD HOC DIVERSITY COMMITTEE.(11) E. PEARL SMITH PASSED AWAY MARCH 9, 2024, AT THE AGE OF 85.(B) DESIGNATION.--THE BRIDGE, IDENTIFIED AS BRIDGE KEY 27695, CARRYING STATE ROUTE 3006, ALSO KNOWN AS WHITEHALL ROAD, OVER KEPNER CREEK IN THE EAST NORRITON TOWNSHIP, MONTGOMERY COUNTY, IS DESIGNATED AS THE E. PEARL SMITH MEMORIAL BRIDGE.(C) SIGNS.--THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL ERECT AND MAINTAIN APPROPRIATE SIGNS DISPLAYING THE NAME OF THE BRIDGE TO TRAFFIC IN BOTH DIRECTIONS ON THE BRIDGE.SECTION 43. REPEALS.SECTION 15 OF THE ACT OF JULY 15, 2024 (P.L.749, NO.63), IS REPEALED.Section 2 44. Effective date.20250SB0078PN1011 - 55 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0078PN1011 - 56 - 1